North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 22H. Mass Mailings and Telephone Banks: Candidate-Specific Communications. [Repealed]

§§ 163-278.110 through 163-278.113.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-381, s. 48.4, effective January 1, 2014.

History.
S. 163-278.110; 2006-233, s. 2; 2007-391, s. 31; 2007-510, s. 2; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-534, s. 10(a), (b); repealed by 2013-381, s. 48.4, effective January 1, 2014. s. 163-278.111; 2006-233, s. 2; repealed by 2013-381,
s. 48.4, effective January 1, 2014. s. 163-278.112; 2006-233, s. 2; 2006-259, s. 29(d); repealed by 2013-381, s. 48.4, effective January 1, 2014. s. 163-278.113:2009-534, s. 10(c); repealed by 2013-381, s. 48.4, effective January 1,
2014.